Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.390

Resort contracts—Purchaser's cancellation—Notice—Statement of right to cancel.

Any camping resort contract may be canceled at the option of the purchaser, if the purchaser sends notice of the cancellation by certified mail (return receipt requested) to the camping resort operator at the address contained in the camping resort contract and if the notice is postmarked not later than midnight of the third business day following the day on which the contract is signed. In addition to this cancellation right, any purchaser who signs a camping resort contract of any description required to be registered with the department without having received the written disclosures required by this chapter has cancellation rights until three business days following eventual receipt of the written disclosures. Purchasers shall request cancellation of contracts by sending the notice of cancellation by certified mail (return receipt requested), postmarked not later than midnight of the third business day following the day on which the contract is signed or the day on which the disclosures were actually received, whichever event is later to the camping resort operator at the address contained in the camping resort contract. In computing the number of business days, the day on which the contract was signed shall not be included as a "business day," nor shall Saturday, Sunday, or legal holidays be included. Within three business days following receipt of timely and proper notice of cancellation from the purchaser, the camping resort operator shall provide evidence that the contract has been canceled. Thereafter, any money or other consideration paid by the purchaser shall be promptly refunded.

Every camping resort contract, other than those being offered and registered as resales, shall include the following statement in at least ten-point boldface type immediately prior to the space for the purchaser's signature:

"Purchaser's right to cancel: You may cancel this contract without any cancellation fee or other penalty, or stated reason for doing so, by sending notice of cancellation by certified mail, return receipt requested, to . . . . . . (insert name and address of camping resort operator). The notice must be postmarked by midnight of the third business day following the day on which the contract is signed. In computing the three business days, the day on which the contract is signed shall not be included as a "business day," nor shall Saturday, Sunday, or legal holidays be included."

If the purchaser has not inspected a camping resort property or facility at which camping resort sites are located or planned, the notice must contain the following additional language:

"If you sign this contract without having inspected a property at which camping sites are located or planned, you may cancel this contract by giving this notice within six (6) business days following the day on which you signed the contract."

[ 1988 c 159 s 15; 1982 c 69 s 10.]